Utah statutes.
57-8-42.   Fair and reasonable notice.

(1)  Notice that an association of unit owners provides by a method allowed under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, constitutes fair and reasonable notice, whether or not the association of unit owners is a nonprofit corporation.

(2)  Notice that an association of unit owners provides by a method not referred to in Subsection (1), including a method described in Subsection (3), constitutes fair and reasonable notice if:

(a)  the method is authorized in the declaration, articles, bylaws, or rules; and

(b)  considering all the circumstances, the notice is fair and reasonable.

(3) (a)  If provided in the declaration, articles, bylaws, or rules, an association of unit owners may provide notice by electronic means, including text message, email, or the website of the association of unit owners.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), a unit owner may, by written demand, require an association of unit owners to provide notice to the unit owner by mail.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

